Arkansas, session 2025, SB571.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 14, Chapter 56, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
14-56-105. Regulation of county-owned property prohibited.
(a) A municipality shall not enforce municipal building or zoning
regulations on county property that is:
(1) Used for a public purpose; and
(2) Located within the corporate limits of the municipality.
(b) A county owning property that is used for a public purpose and is
located within the corporate limits of a municipality shall comply with the
building and zoning regulations of the county.

/s/J. Petty

*SSS247*
04-10-2025 09:35:16 SSS247